North Dakota, session 69, HB1164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subdivision a of subsection 5 of section 15.1-32-01 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
a. "Student with a disability" means an individual who is at least three years of age but who
has not reached the age of twenty-one before August first of the year in which the
individual turns twenty-one and who requires special education and related services
because of:
(1) An intellectual disability;
(2) ABeing deaf or hard of hearing impairment, including deafness;
(3) Deaf-blindness;
(4) A speech or language impairment;
(5) A visual impairment, including blindness;
(6) An emotional disturbancedisability;
(7) An orthopedic impairment;
(8) Autism;
(9) A traumatic brain injury;
(10) OtherAn other health impairment; or
(11) A specific learning disability.

H. B. NO. 1164 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1164.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 1 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State